Idaho statutes. Title 56 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND WELFARE
Chapter 2 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE LAW
§ 56-209h. Administrative remedies.

Definitions. For purposes of this section:

“Abuse” or “abusive” means provider practices that are inconsistent with sound fiscal, business, child care or medical practices, and result in an unnecessary cost to a public assistance program, in reimbursement for services that are not medically necessary or that fail to meet professionally recognized standards for health care, or in physical harm, pain or mental anguish to a public assistance recipient.

“Claim” means any request or demand for payment, or document submitted to initiate payment, for items or services provided under a public assistance program, whether under a contract or otherwise.

“Fraud” or “fraudulent” means an intentional deception or misrepresentation made by a person with the knowledge that the deception could result in some unauthorized benefit to himself or some other person.

“Intentional program violation” means intentionally false or misleading action, omission or statement made in order to qualify as a provider or recipient in a public assistance program.

“Knowingly,” “known” or “with knowledge” means that a person, with respect to information or an action:

Has actual knowledge of the information or action; or

Acts in deliberate ignorance of the truth or falsity of the information or the correctness or incorrectness of the action; or

Acts in reckless disregard of the truth or falsity of the information or the correctness or incorrectness of the action.

Is an officer or director of an entity that is organized as a corporation; or

Is a partner in an entity that is organized as a partnership; or

Is a managing member in an entity that is organized as a limited liability company.

“Managing employee” means a general manager, business manager, administrator, director or other individual who exercises operational or managerial control over, or who directly or indirectly conducts the day-to-day operation of, an institution, organization or agency.

“Medicaid fraud control unit” means that medicaid fraud control unit as provided for in section 56-226, Idaho Code.

“Ownership or control interest” means a person or entity that:

Has an ownership interest totaling twenty-five percent (25%) or more in an entity; or

“Provider” means an individual, organization, agency or other entity providing items or services under a public assistance program.

“Public assistance program” means assistance for which provision is made in any federal or state law existing or hereafter enacted by the state of Idaho or the congress of the United States by which payments are made from the federal government to the state in aid, or in respect to payment by the state for welfare purposes to any category of needy person, and any other program of assistance for which provision for federal or state funds for aid may from time to time be made.

The department shall establish and operate an administrative fraud control program to enforce violations of the provisions of this chapter and of the state plan pursuant to subchapters XIX and XXI, chapter 7, title 42, U.S.C., that are outside the scope of the duties of the medicaid fraud control unit and to render and receive referrals from and to said unit.
(3) Review of documentation of services. All claims submitted by providers for payment are subject to prepayment and postpayment review as designated by rule. Except as otherwise provided by rule, providers shall generate documentation at the time of service sufficient to support each claim, and shall retain the documentation for a minimum of five (5) years from the date the item or service was provided. The department or authorized agent shall be given immediate access to such documentation upon written request.

Submits a claim with knowledge that the claim is incorrect, including reporting costs as allowable which were known to be disallowed in a previous audit, unless the provider clearly indicates that the item is being claimed to establish the basis for an appeal and each disputed item and amount is specifically identified; or

Submits a fraudulent claim; or

Knowingly makes a false statement or representation of material fact in any document required to be maintained or submitted to the department; or

Submits a claim for an item or service known to be medically unnecessary; or

Fails to provide, upon written request by the department, immediate access to documentation required to be maintained; or

Fails repeatedly or substantially to comply with the rules and regulations governing medical assistance payments or other public assistance program payments; or

Knowingly violates any material term or condition of its provider agreement; or

Has failed to repay, or was a “managing employee” or had an “ownership or control interest” in any entity that has failed to repay, any overpayments or claims previously found to have been obtained contrary to statute, rule, regulation or provider agreement; or

Has been found, or was a “managing employee” in any entity that has been found, to have engaged in fraudulent conduct or abusive conduct in connection with the delivery of health care or public assistance items or services; or
(j) Fails to meet the qualifications specifically required by rule or by any applicable licensing board.

(4) Immediate action. In the event that the department identifies a suspected case of fraud or abuse and the department has reason to believe that payments made during the investigation may be difficult or impractical to recover, the department may suspend or withhold payments to the provider pending investigation. In the event that the department identifies a suspected case of fraud or abuse and it determines that it is necessary to prevent or avoid immediate danger to the public health or safety, the department may summarily suspend a provider agreement pending investigation. When payments have been suspended or withheld or a provider agreement suspended pending investigation, the department shall provide for a hearing within thirty (30) days of receipt of any duly filed notice of appeal.

(5) Recovery of payments. Upon referral of a matter from the medicaid fraud control unit, or if it is determined by the department that any condition of payment contained in rule, regulation, statute, or provider agreement was not met, the department may initiate administrative proceedings to recover any payments made for items or services under any public assistance contract or provider agreement the individual or entity has with the department. Interest shall accrue on overpayments at the statutory rate set forth in section 28-22-104, Idaho Code, from the date of final determination of the amount owed for items or services until the date of recovery.

(6) Provider status. The department may terminate the provider agreement or otherwise deny provider status to any individual or entity who:

Any individual or entity denied provider status under this section may be precluded from participating as a provider in any public assistance program for up to five (5) years from the date the department’s action becomes final.

(7) The department must refer all cases of suspected medicaid provider fraud to the medicaid fraud control unit and shall promptly comply with any request from the medicaid fraud control unit for access to and free copies of any records or information kept by the department or its contractors, computerized data stored by the department or its contractors, and any information kept by providers to which the department is authorized access by law.

(8) Civil monetary penalties. The department may also assess civil monetary penalties against a provider and any officer, director, owner, and/or managing employee of a provider in the circumstances listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection. The penalties provided for in this subsection are intended to be remedial, recovering, at a minimum, costs of investigation and administrative review, and placing the costs associated with noncompliance on the offending provider. The department shall promulgate rules clarifying the methodology used when computing and assessing a civil monetary penalty.

(a) For conduct identified in subsection (6)(a) through (i) of this section, the amount of the penalties shall be up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each item or service improperly claimed, except that in the case of multiple penalties the department may reduce the penalties to not less than ten percent (10%) of the amount of each item or service improperly claimed if an amount can be readily determined. Each line item of a claim, or cost on a cost report is considered a separate claim.

(b) For failing to perform required background checks or failing to meet required timelines for completion of background checks, the amount of the penalty shall be five hundred dollars ($500) for each month worked for each staff person for whom the background check was not performed or not timely performed up to a maximum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per month. A partial month is considered a full month for purposes of determining the amount of the penalty.

(9) Exclusion. Any individual or entity convicted of a criminal offense related to the delivery of an item or service under any state or federal program shall be excluded from program participation as a medicaid provider for a period of not less than ten (10) years. Unless otherwise provided in this section or required by federal law, the department may exclude any individual or entity for a period of not less than one (1) year for any conduct for which the secretary of the department of health and human services or designee could exclude an individual or entity.

(10) Sanction of individuals or entities. The department may sanction individuals or entities by barring them from public assistance programs for intentional program violations where the federal law allows sanctioning individuals from receiving assistance. Individuals or entities who are determined to have committed an intentional program violation will be sanctioned from receiving public assistance for a period of twelve (12) months for the first violation, twenty-four (24) months for the second violation and permanently for the third violation.

(11) Individuals or entities subject to administrative remedies as described in subsections (4) through (10) of this section shall be provided the opportunity to appeal pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and the department’s rules for contested cases.

§ 56-209i. Legislative findings.

It is the intent of the legislature that the provisions of this act enhance the employability of participants in the temporary assistance for families in Idaho (TAFI) programs through substance abuse screening and, where appropriate, testing and treatment. The legislature finds that a significant number of employers use preemployment drug testing. Substance abuse adds to the difficulties such individuals have in securing employment. The legislature also finds that substance abuse in and of itself impairs personal responsibility and self-sufficiency and stands in the way of the very intent of the TAFI program to care for the health and welfare of certain qualified recipients and in so doing results in welfare costs that burden the state’s taxpayers. The legislature further finds that substance abuse adversely affects a significant portion of the workforce, which results in billions of dollars of lost productivity each year and poses a threat to the safety of the workplace and to the public safety and security. In balancing the interests of taxpayers, participants in the TAFI program and potential employers against the interests of those who will be screened and tested under this act, the legislature finds that screening, testing and treatment as provided for in this act are in the greater interests of all concerned.

§ 56-209j. Substance abuse screening and testing programs.

The department of health and welfare shall develop for implementation in fiscal year 2001, a program to screen each applicant who is otherwise eligible for temporary cash assistance provided under this chapter, and to subject to testing any applicant or participant who the department has reasonable suspicion to believe, based on the screening or other factors, is at risk of substance abuse.

Prior to the first regular session of the fifty-sixth Idaho legislature, the department shall promulgate the necessary rules, pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, to govern substance abuse screening and testing for TAFI programs. Rules shall, at a minimum:

Specifically address the confidentiality of the screening and test results, and provide that individual results are protected under section 74-106(6), Idaho Code, and are not subject to disclosure except to an evaluating or treating substance abuse program, and cannot be released for use in any criminal investigation or proceeding;

Provide notice of screening and testing requirements to each applicant at the time of application. The notice must, at a minimum, advise the applicant that substance abuse screening and possible testing will be conducted as a condition for receiving temporary assistance or services under this chapter. The applicant shall be advised that the required screening and possible testing may be avoided if the applicant does not apply for or receive assistance or services. The screening and testing program is not applicable in child only cases;

Develop procedures for substance abuse screening and testing of applicants for and recipients of temporary assistance or services under the TAFI program;

Provide a procedure to advise each person to be tested, before the test is conducted, that he or she may, but is not required to, advise the agent administering the test of any prescription or over-the-counter medication he or she is taking;

Require each person to be tested to sign a written acknowledgment that he or she has received and understood the notice and advice provided under paragraphs (a) and (d) of this subsection;

Provide a procedure to assure each person being tested a reasonable degree of dignity while producing and submitting a sample for drug testing, consistent with the state’s need to ensure the reliability of the sample;

Specify circumstances under which a person who tests positive has the right to take one (1) or more additional tests;

Provide a procedure for appealing the results of a test by a person who tests positive, and denial of TAFI services or benefits;

Provide a definition for reasonable suspicion and high risk;

Delineate the substances which will be screened;

Establish outcome measures which can substantiate program effectiveness.

§ 56-209k. Children.

If a parent is deemed ineligible for cash assistance due to the operation of this act, his or her dependent child’s eligibility for cash assistance is not affected.

If a parent is deemed ineligible for cash assistance due to the operation of this act, an appropriate protective payee may be established for the benefit of the child.

If the parent refuses to cooperate in establishing an appropriate protective payee for the child, the department may appoint one.

§ 56-209l. Treatment provisions.

The department shall refer for appropriate evaluation and provide for the treatment of any applicant or participant who, in the reasonable suspicion of the department, is engaged in substance abuse. Treatment shall be community-based and gender-specific. The department shall provide for the transportation and child care needs of the applicant if necessary. TAFI benefits or services may be denied to any applicant or participant who refuses to cooperate with reasonable screening, testing or treatment requests, or who, based on a preponderance of the evidence, engages in substance abuse following treatment. Any individual referred to treatment shall be notified of the local treatment programs appropriate to that person’s needs.

§ 56-209m. Weight control pilot project.

Based upon available funding, the director of the department of health and welfare is directed to apply for the appropriate waiver or waivers from the centers for medicare and medicaid services for the state medicaid program to conduct a pilot project to determine the effectiveness of, and projected cost savings which may result from, providing reimbursement for weight control therapies, including anorexic drugs, and nutritional, diet and exercise counseling, in the state medicaid drug program, with the following limitations:

Participation in the pilot program shall be limited to one hundred (100) clients;

The length of the pilot program shall be limited to three (3) years;

Participation shall be limited to clients with a body mass index (BMI) over twenty-five (25); and

The department shall report annually to the senate and house health and welfare committees concerning the progress on all programs initiated under the waiver.

§ 56-209n. Medicaid for workers with disabilities.

The legislature finds that many individuals with disabilities would like to work but cannot afford to enter the workforce due to the fear of losing necessary medical services received through medicaid. Idaho hereby seeks to avail itself of the opportunity available through the federal ticket to work and work incentives improvement act of 1999, which allows states to establish new medicaid eligibility categories for working people with disabilities whose income or resources would otherwise make them ineligible for medicaid. Eliminating barriers to health care and other needed services and supports and creating financial incentives to work will greatly improve the short and long-term financial independence and well-being of people with disabilities. Medicaid for workers with disabilities will serve to increase the productivity of Idaho residents with disabilities and thereby enhance the economic and fiscal status of this state.

An individual is eligible to participate in the medicaid for workers with disabilities program if the individual:

Is at least sixteen (16) years of age and not more than sixty-four (64) years of age;

Has a disability as defined in title XVI of the federal social security act, as amended. An individual shall be determined to be eligible under this section without regard to his or her ability to engage in, or actual engagement in, substantial gainful activity, as defined in section 223(d)(4) of the social security act (42 U.S.C. section 423(d)(4));

Is employed, including self-employment, and has provided the department of health and welfare with satisfactory written proof of employment. Hourly wage or hours worked shall not be used to determine employment;

Has countable resources of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or less. In calculating resources the following items shall be excluded: a second car, life insurance policies, retirement accounts, beneficial trusts, and any other resources excluded under current rules promulgated by the department of health and welfare for aid to aged, blind and disabled (AABD); and

Has countable income, after exclusions and disregards as set forth in rules promulgated by the department of health and welfare for participants receiving AABD benefits, which do [does] not exceed five hundred percent (500%) of the federal poverty level.

An eligible individual who has an income as determined pursuant to subsection (2)(e) of this section less than one hundred thirty-three percent (133%) of the federal poverty level shall not be required to pay a premium for medicaid.

The department of health and welfare may require an eligible individual who has an income as determined pursuant to subsection (2)(e) of this section of one hundred thirty-three percent (133%) to two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal poverty level to pay a monthly premium as set forth in rules promulgated by the department of health and welfare.

§ 56-209o. Failure to retain records.

Whoever receives payment for treatment, services or goods under the provisions of this chapter or under the state plan pursuant to subchapter XIX or XXI, chapter 7, title 42, U.S.C., shall retain for a period of at least five (5) years all records required to be maintained by rule of the department for administration of the medicaid program.

It shall be unlawful with an intent to evade or avoid the provisions of this act: to fail to retain the records specified in subsection (1) of this section for a period of at least five (5) years from the date payment was claimed or received, whichever is later; or to knowingly destroy or cause the records specified in subsection (1) of this section to be destroyed within five (5) years from the date payment was claimed or received, whichever is later. Any person who, with an intent to evade or avoid the provisions of this act, fails to retain records or destroys records or causes records to be destroyed as provided in this subsection (2), with an intent to evade or avoid the provisions of this act, shall be subject to the following criminal sanctions:

If the treatment, services or goods for which records were not retained or for which records were destroyed amount to not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), the person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be sentenced pursuant to section 18-113, Idaho Code.

If the value of the treatment, services or goods for which records were not retained or for which records were destroyed is more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), the person shall be guilty of a felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to section 18-112, Idaho Code.

If the records not retained or destroyed were used in whole or in part to determine a rate of payment under the program, the person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be sentenced pursuant to section 18-113, Idaho Code.

§ 56-209p. Payment for midwife services.

A midwife licensed pursuant to chapter 55, title 54, Idaho Code, shall be entitled to payment under the rules of the medical assistance program for midwife services provided to an eligible recipient of medical assistance.

§ 56-210. Amount of assistance.

The amount of public assistance which any eligible person or family may receive shall be determined in accordance with the rules of the state department subject to the availability of funds for such assistance.

Old age assistance, aid to the blind and aid to the permanently and totally disabled shall be granted to a person who is needy as defined by the department and who meets the nonfinancial requirements of title XVI of the social security act.

The department may also increase or decrease the payment for groups of cases where the circumstances are specifically identified. The department shall be the single state agency for administration of public assistance programs or plans that receive federal funding.

§ 56-210a. Amount of medical assistance for the aged. [Repealed.]

§ 56-211. Application for public assistance — Verification for federal food stamp program.

Application for public assistance under this act shall be made in the manner and form prescribed by the state department and the application shall contain such information bearing on the applicant’s eligibility as the state department may require and as required in subsection (2) of this section.

Applicants seeking benefits under the federal food stamp program shall verify to the state department the identity of each household member the applicant lists on the application for such benefits. Identification may be verified either through readily available documentary evidence, such as a birth certificate, or through a collateral contact as set forth in federal law, 7 CFR 273.2. Upon a showing of good cause by the applicant as to why such documentary evidence or collateral contact has not been provided, the state department shall grant an extension and the applicant may receive the public assistance for which he or she has applied for one (1) month. A showing of good cause shall be required each month the applicant fails to provide the state department with the required documentary evidence or collateral contact. Good cause is not shown where a delay in providing documentary evidence or providing a collateral contact is due to illness, lack of transportation or temporary absences. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to applicants who provide, or who have previously provided, a document as set forth in section 67-7903(4)(b)(viii) or (ix), Idaho Code.

The state department may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.

§ 56-212. Investigation of application.

Whenever the state department shall receive an application for public assistance under this act, it shall promptly make an investigation and record of the circumstances of the applicant in order to ascertain the facts supporting the application and to obtain such other information as it may require.

§ 56-213. Examination to determine blindness.

No application for aid to the blind shall be approved until an ophthalmologist or physician skilled in diseases of the eye, or an optometrist, approved or designated by the state department, shall have examined the applicant and shall have certified his findings in the manner and form required by the state department.

§ 56-214. Award of public assistance — Ineligibility upon transfer of property.

Upon the completion of the investigation, the state department shall determine whether the applicant is eligible for public assistance under the provisions of this act, the type and amount of public assistance he shall receive, and the date upon which such public assistance shall begin. Public assistance shall be paid in the manner prescribed by the state department.

Assistance to families with children shall not be granted under this act to any person who within six (6) months prior to applying for or at any time during which such assistance is received, has either made an assignment or transfer of property for the purpose of rendering himself eligible for assistance under this act, or who has divested himself of any interest in property without adequate consideration which interest or proceeds therefrom could reasonably be expected to contribute to the support and maintenance of such person and his family, except that any person who is ineligible for public assistance due solely to such assignment or transfer shall become eligible provided:

There is a showing that such person has caused such property to be assigned or transferred back to him; or

There is a showing that the person to whom such property is assigned or transferred has, subsequent to such assignment or transfer, met subsistence and medical care costs exclusive of any obligation for support, of such person or family, according to the department’s assistance standard, equal to, or in excess of, the market value of the property so assigned or transferred; or

There is a showing that the subsistence and medical care costs of such person, according to the department’s assistance standard, subsequent to such assignment or transfer, equal or exceed the market value of the property so assigned or transferred.

Eligibility for old age assistance under section 56-207, Idaho Code, or aid to the blind under section 56-208, Idaho Code, or aid to the disabled under section 56-209a, Idaho Code, shall be determined by continuing to consider as available any resource that was transferred prior to July 1, 1988, until such resource is fully accounted for under the provisions of section 1613(c) of the social security act as such section read on June 30, 1988.

Eligibility for medical assistance under section 56-209b, Idaho Code, shall continue to apply the rules of the director of the department of health and welfare concerning transfer of property as such rules read on October 29, 1988, to transfers that occur prior to July 1, 1989, to persons other than to the spouse of the person receiving or applying for medical assistance, and to interspousal transfers that occur prior to October 1, 1989.

The provisions of section 1917(c) of the social security act as amended by public law 100-360 and further amended by public law 100-485 and as hereafter amended shall apply as of July 1, 1989, to transfers of assets other than to the spouse, and as of October 1, 1989, to transfers between spouses, except that such provisions shall not apply either to transfers that occurred before July 1, 1988, or to transfers that have been fully accounted for under subsection (3) of this section. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any transfer of assets not otherwise specifically permitted by federal law or rule of the department not for fair market value is presumed to be for the purpose of sheltering assets to qualify for medical assistance. Such assets transferred shall be counted as available in determining eligibility, and will subject the applicant to penalties prescribed by the director, unless the applicant for assistance can demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the transfer was intended for another purpose.

Any funds, securities, accounts, contracts and all other property held in or transferred to a special needs trust as provided in chapter 14, title 68, Idaho Code, section 15-5-409, Idaho Code, and section 15-5-409a, Idaho Code, shall not be considered by the state department in determining whether the applicant is eligible for public assistance under the provisions of this act, so long as the action is permitted under the provisions of section 1917(c) and (d) of the social security act, as amended.

If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section that can be given effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.

§ 56-214A. Award of public assistance — Recipient’s right of free choice.

If an award of public assistance which includes an eye examination is made to or in behalf of an individual, that individual or his legal custodian shall have the right to select any practitioner to perform such examination who is licensed by the state of Idaho to perform eye examinations. Whenever such an award is applied for or approved, the state department or its personnel shall not recommend any practitioner or system of practice from among those licensed to perform eye examinations.

§ 56-215. Redetermination of awards.

Awards of public assistance may be changed or withdrawn whenever the circumstances have altered sufficiently to warrant such action. If at any time during the continuance of public assistance the recipient thereof becomes possessed of income or resources in excess of the amount previously reported by him, it shall be his duty to notify the state department of this fact immediately on the receipt or possession of such additional income or resources.

§ 56-216. Appeal and fair hearing.

An applicant or recipient aggrieved because of the state department’s decision or delay in making a decision shall be entitled to appeal to the state department in the manner prescribed by it and shall be afforded reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing by the state department.

§ 56-217. Cooperative agreements.

The state department and the several counties of the state or other branches of state, county or municipal government are authorized to enter into cooperative agreements, through their appropriate officials, with respect to the administration of public assistance and social services. Among other things such an agreement may provide for:

The assumption by the state department of responsibilities involving public assistance or social services ordinarily incumbent upon the county or other branch of government;

The direct administration through the state department of any form of public assistance or care of the poor now or hereafter authorized to be granted by a county, but subject to the financial control of the county;

Mutual financial participation in programs of public assistance and social services in conformity with regulations of the department.

The intake and investigation of applications for public assistance by the appropriate office of the state department;

The granting of public assistance financed in whole or in part by county funds on the basis of policies, rules and regulations governing eligibility and amount of assistance adopted by the state department under this act.

§ 56-218. Recovery of certain medical assistance.

Except where exempted or waived in accordance with federal law medical assistance pursuant to this chapter paid on behalf of an individual who was fifty-five (55) years of age or older when the individual received such assistance may be recovered from the individual’s estate, and the estate of the spouse, if any, for such aid paid to either or both:

There shall be no adjustment or recovery until after the death of both the individual and the spouse, if any, and only at a time when the individual has no surviving child who is under twenty-one (21) years of age or is blind or permanently and totally disabled as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1382c.

While one (1) spouse survives, except where joint probate will be authorized pursuant to section 15-3-111, Idaho Code, a claim for recovery under this section may be established in the estate of the deceased spouse.

The claim against the estate of the first deceased spouse must be made within the time provided by section 15-3-801(b), Idaho Code, if the estate is administered and actual notice is given to the director as required by subsection (5) of this section. However, if there is no administration of the estate of the first deceased spouse, or if no actual notice is given to the director as required by subsection (5) of this section, no claim shall be required until the time provided for creditor claims in the estate of the survivor.

Nothing in this section authorizes the recovery of the amount of any aid from the estate or surviving spouse of a recipient to the extent that the need for aid resulted from a crime committed against the recipient.

Transfers of real or personal property, on or after the look-back dates defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396p, by recipients of such aid, or their spouses, without adequate consideration are voidable and may be set aside by an action in the district court.

Except where there is a surviving spouse, or a surviving child who is under twenty-one (21) years of age or is blind or permanently and totally disabled as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1382c, the amount of any medical assistance paid under this chapter on behalf of an individual who was fifty-five (55) years of age or older when the individual received such assistance is a claim against the estate in any guardianship or conservatorship proceedings and may be paid from the estate.

For purposes of this section, the term “estate” shall include:

All real and personal property and other assets included within the individual’s estate, as defined for purposes of state probate law; and

Any other real and personal property and other assets in which the individual had any legal title or interest at the time of death, to the extent of such interest, including such assets conveyed to a survivor, heir, or assign of the deceased individual through joint tenancy, tenancy in common, survivorship, life estate, living trust or other arrangement.

Claims made pursuant to this section shall be classified and paid as a debt with preference as defined in section 15-3-805(5), Idaho Code. Any distribution or transfer of the estate prior to satisfying such claim is voidable and may be set aside by an action in the district court. The personal representative of every estate subject to a claim under this section must, within thirty (30) days of the appointment, give notice in writing to the director of his or her appointment to administer the estate.
(6) The department may file a notice of lien against the property of any estate subject to a claim under this section.

In order to perfect a lien against real or personal property, the department shall, within ninety (90) days after the personal representative or successor makes a written request for prompt action to the director, or three (3) years from the death of the decedent, whichever is sooner, file a notice of lien in the same general form and manner as provided in section 56-218A(3)(a), Idaho Code, in the office of the secretary of state, pursuant to section 45-1904, Idaho Code. Failure to file a notice of lien does not affect the validity of claims made pursuant to this section.

The department may release the lien in whole or in part to permit the estate property to be administered by a court-appointed personal representative.

The department may foreclose its lien, without probate, in any of the following circumstances:

Where no personal representative has been appointed after one (1) year from the date of death of the survivor of both the individual and spouse, if any;

Where the property has been abandoned by the decedent’s heirs or successors, if any;

Where the real property taxes that are due and payable have remained unpaid for two (2) years and, after demand by the department, the heirs or successors, if any, have failed to seek appointment or pay the property taxes; or

Where all parties interested in the estate consent to foreclosure of the lien.

A son or daughter of the individual, who was residing in the individual’s home for a period of at least two (2) years immediately before the date of the individual’s admission to the medical institution and who establishes to the satisfaction of the state that he or she provided care to such individual which permitted such individual to reside at home rather than in an institution.

(7) The director shall promulgate rules reasonably necessary to implement this section including, but not limited to, rules establishing undue hardship waivers for the following circumstances:

(a) The estate subject to recovery is income-producing property that provides the primary source of support for other family members; or

(b) The estate has a value below an amount specified in the rules; or

(c) Recovery by the department will cause the heirs of the deceased individual to be eligible for public assistance.

(8) The cause of action to void a transfer without adequate consideration established in this section shall not be deemed to have accrued until the department discovers, or reasonably could have discovered, the facts constituting the transfer without adequate consideration.